Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.370

Lease of real property under electrical transmission lines for private gardening purposes.

A city or town owning facilities for the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants with electricity may lease for private gardening purposes the real property under its electrical transmission and distribution lines for a nominal rent to any person who has an income of less than ten thousand dollars per year.

[ 1981 c 100 s 1.]